src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_A_mashkimod_gt-norm.yaml
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodensiniidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodensiniidiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodensiniidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+4: omashkimodensiwaabaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omashkimodensiwaabaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omashkimodensiwaabaniig
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodensiwaadigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodensiwaadiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodensiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nimashkimodaamishinaaniban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodaamishinaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodaamishinaaniban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaamishinaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodaamishiwaaban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaamishiwaadig
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: omashkimodaamishiniiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaamishiniidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: omashkimodaamishiwaaban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaamishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nimashkimodaamishinaanin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nimashkimodaamishinaaning
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nimashkimodaamishinaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gimashkimodaamishinaanin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaamishinaaning
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaamishinaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: gimashkimodaamishiwaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaamishiwaang
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaamishiwaag
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+4: omashkimodaamishiniwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Loc: omashkimodaamishiniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+4+Pl: omashkimodaamishiniwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: omashkimodaamishiwaan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: omashkimodaamishiwaang
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: omashkimodaamishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: nimashkimodaamishibaniin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nimashkimodaamishibaniing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nimashkimodaamishibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: gimashkimodaamishibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodaamishibaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodaamishibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: omashkimodaamishibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: omashkimodaamishibaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: omashkimodaamishibaniin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: imashkimodaamishibaniin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: imashkimodaamishibaniing
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: imashkimodaamishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimashkimodaaminaanibaniin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimashkimodaaminaanibaniing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimashkimodaaminaanibaniig
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimashkimodaaminaanidigan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimashkimodaaminaanidiging
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimashkimodaaminaanidigag
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimashkimodaaminaanibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodaaminaanibaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodaaminaanibaniig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimashkimodaaminaanidigan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaaminaanidiging
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaaminaanidigag
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimashkimodaamiwaabaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodaamiwaabaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodaamiwaabaniig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimashkimodaamiwaadigan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaamiwaadiging
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaamiwaadigag
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+Prt+4: omashkimodaaminiibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+Prt+Loc: omashkimodaaminiibaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+Prt+Pl: omashkimodaaminiibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodaaminiidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodaaminiidiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodaaminiidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+4: omashkimodaamiwaabaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omashkimodaamiwaabaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omashkimodaamiwaabaniig
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodaamiwaadigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodaamiwaadiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodaamiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nimashkimodaashinaanibaniin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nimashkimodaashinaanibaniing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nimashkimodaashinaanibaniig
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nimashkimodaashinaanidigan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nimashkimodaashinaanidiging
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nimashkimodaashinaanidigag
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gimashkimodaashinaanibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodaashinaanibaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodaashinaanibaniig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimashkimodaashinaanidigan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaashinaanidiging
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaashinaanidigag
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gimashkimodaashiwaabaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodaashiwaabaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodaashiwaabaniig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gimashkimodaashiwaadigan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaashiwaadiging
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaashiwaadigag
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: omashkimodaashiniibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: omashkimodaashiniibaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: omashkimodaashiniibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodaashiniidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodaashiniidiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodaashiniidigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: omashkimodaashiwaabaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: omashkimodaashiwaabaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: omashkimodaashiwaabaniig
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: omashkimodaashiwaadigan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: omashkimodaashiwaadiging
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: omashkimodaashiwaadigag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nimashkimodenyimishinaaniban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodenyimishinaanidig
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nimashkimodensimishinaaniban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodensimishinaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodenyimishinaaniban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishinaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodenyimishiwaaban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishiwaadig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodensimishinaaniban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodensimishinaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodensimishiwaaban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodensimishiwaadig
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: omashkimodenyimishiniiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: omashkimodenyimishiniidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: omashkimodenyimishiwaaban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omashkimodenyimishiwaadig
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: omashkimodensimishiniiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: omashkimodensimishiniidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: omashkimodensimishiwaaban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omashkimodensimishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nimashkimodenyimishinaanin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nimashkimodenyimishinaaning
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nimashkimodenyimishinaanig
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nimashkimodensimishinaanin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nimashkimodensimishinaaning
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nimashkimodensimishinaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gimashkimodenyimishinaanin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodenyimishinaaning
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishinaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: gimashkimodenyimishiwaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodenyimishiwaang
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishiwaag
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gimashkimodensimishinaanin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodensimishinaaning
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodensimishinaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: gimashkimodensimishiwaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodensimishiwaang
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodensimishiwaag
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+4: omashkimodenyimishiniwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Loc: omashkimodenyimishiniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Pl: omashkimodenyimishiniwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: omashkimodenyimishiwaan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: omashkimodenyimishiwaang
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: omashkimodenyimishiwaag
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+4: omashkimodensimishiniwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Loc: omashkimodensimishiniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Pl: omashkimodensimishiniwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: omashkimodensimishiwaan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: omashkimodensimishiwaang
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: omashkimodensimishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: nimashkimodenyimishibaniin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nimashkimodenyimishibaniing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nimashkimodenyimishibaniin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: nimashkimodensimishibaniin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nimashkimodensimishibaniing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nimashkimodensimishibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: gimashkimodenyimishibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodenyimishibaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodenyimishibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: gimashkimodensimishibaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodensimishibaniing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gimashkimodensimishibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: omashkimodenyimishibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: omashkimodenyimishibaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: omashkimodenyimishibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: omashkimodensimishibaniin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: omashkimodensimishibaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: omashkimodensimishibaniin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: imashkimodenyimishibaniin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: imashkimodenyimishibaniing
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: imashkimodenyimishibaniin
